Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-1815
Real property taxes; county treasurer; attendance at tax sale; penalty.

If any treasurer fails to attend any sale of real property as required by sections 77-1801 to 77-1814, either in person or by designee, he or she shall be liable to a fine of not less than fifty nor more than three hundred dollars to be recovered by an action in the district court in the name of the county against the treasurer and the person issuing the treasurer's bond.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 207, p. 464;

R.S.1913, § 6535;

C.S.1922, § 6063;

C.S.1929, § 77-2015;

R.S.1943, § 77-1815;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 148;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 121;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 20.